Maryland, session 2026, HB1620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–301.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a custodian shall deny inspection of a
public record or any part of a public record if:
(1) by law, the public record is privileged or confidential; or
(2) the inspection would be contrary to:
(i) a State statute;
(ii) a federal statute or a regulation that is issued under the statute
and has the force of law;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1620*

HOUSE BILL 1620
(iii) the rules adopted by the Supreme Court of Maryland; or
(iv) an order of a court of record.
(b) If an applicant files a complaint with the Ombudsman challenging a denial or
the application of an exemption under this subtitle, the custodian shall demonstrate that:
(1) the denial or the exemption is clearly applicable to the requested public
record; and
(2) if inspection is denied under Part IV of this subtitle, the harm from
disclosure of the public record is greater than the public interest in access to the information
in the public record.
(C) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, A
CUSTODIAN SHALL ALLOW AN INSPECTOR GENERAL WHOSE OFFICE IS CREATED BY
STATE LAW OR LOCAL LAW TO INSPECT A PUBLIC RECORD OR ANY PART OF A PUBLIC
RECORD IF:
(I) A STATE OR LOCAL LAW AUTHORIZES THE INSPECTOR
GENERAL TO HAVE ACCESS TO AND INSPECT THE PUBLIC RECORD; AND
(II) THE INSPECTOR GENERAL REQUIRES ACCESS TO THE
PUBLIC RECORD TO PERFORM THE INSPECTOR GENERAL’S DUTIES.
(2) ANY REDISCLOSURE BY AN INSPECTOR GENERAL OF A PUBLIC
RECORD RECEIVED UNDER THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.